Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-1202
Commission; chairperson; executive director; compensation; duties; bond; personnel; duties; bonded or insured; vested with authority and power of law enforcement officer.

(1) The commission shall elect one of its members to be chairperson thereof, and it shall be authorized to employ such other assistants and employees as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 and the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act. The commission shall employ an executive director who shall be selected by the commission subject to the approval of the Governor. The executive director shall devote full time to the duties of the office and shall not engage in any other business or profession or hold any other state public office. The executive director shall keep a record of the proceedings of the commission, preserve the books, records, and documents entrusted to the executive director, and perform such other duties as the commission shall prescribe; and the commission shall require the executive director to give bond in such sum as it may fix, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of the executive director. The commission shall be authorized to fix the compensation of the executive director, and also the compensation of its other employees, subject to the approval of the Governor. The commission shall have an office at such place within the state as it may determine and shall meet at least six times per year.

(2) The commission shall appoint or employ deputies, investigators, inspectors, agents, security personnel, and other persons as deemed necessary to administer and effectively enforce the regulation of horseracing and the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act. Any appointed or employed personnel shall perform the duties assigned by the commission.

(3) All personnel appointed or employed by the commission shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201. As specified by the commission, certain personnel shall be vested with the authority and power of a law enforcement officer to carry out the laws of this state administered by the commission.

Laws 1935, c. 173, § 2, p. 630;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-1502;

R.S.1943, § 2-1202;

Laws 1967, c. 4, § 1, p. 72;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB876, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB839, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB357, § 2.

Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act, see section 9-1101.

Secretary of Racing Commission is an employee thereof and is subject to such duties as commission may prescribe. Neff v. Boomer, 149 Neb. 361, 31 N.W.2d 222 (1948).